Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2255
Abuse, neglect, or exploitation; referral required; procedure.

(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law related to reporting, when abuse, neglect, or exploitation of a resident is suspected, the long-term care ombudsman program, with the permission of the resident or the resident representative, shall make an immediate referral to adult protective services of the department or the appropriate law enforcement agency.

(2) Any state agency or board which responds to a complaint against a long-term care facility or an individual employed by a long-term care facility that was referred to the state agency or board by the office shall forward to the office copies of related inspection reports, plans of correction, and notice of any citations and sanctions levied against the long-term care facility or the individual.

Laws 1992, LB 677, § 19;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 885;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 772;

Laws 2018, LB903, § 19.